District of Columbia statutes.
50-1331.05

Restrictions on use and transfer of Salvage Vehicles.

(a)

No Salvage Vehicle may be registered under subchapter I of Chapter 15 of this title.

(b)

Ownership of a Salvage Vehicle shall be transferred only through the use of a Salvage Title.

History

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 105, 52 DCR 1700